Tennessee, session 114, SB1343.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 42-4-105(d)(1)(H), is amended by
deleting the language "and the speaker of the senate" and substituting instead the language
"the speaker of the senate, and the legislative librarian".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to reports submitted on or after that date.
SB1343
003344
- 1 -